North Carolina, session 2025, HB695.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

ALLOCATE A PERCENTAGE OF 911 FUNDS TO SUPPORT THE STATE'S VIPER
RADIO SYSTEM INSOFAR AS THAT SYSTEM SUPPORTS 911 OPERATIONS IN
THE STATE
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 143B-1404(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) Allocation of Revenues. – The 911 Board may deduct and retain for its administrative
expenses a percentage of the total service charges remitted to it under G.S. 143B-1403 for deposit
in the 911 Fund. The percentage may not exceed three and one-half percent (3.5%). The
percentage is one percent (1%) unless the 911 Board sets the percentage at a different amount.
The 911 Board must monitor the amount of funds required to meet its duties under this Part and
set the rate at an amount that enables the 911 Board to meet this commitment. The 911 Board
must allocate a minimum of fifteen percent (15%) of the total service charges to the Next
Generation 911 Reserve Fund to be administered as provided in G.S. 143B-1407. The 911 Board
must allocate a minimum of five percent (5%) of the total service charges to the PSAP Grant and
Statewide Projects Account to be administered as provided in G.S. 143B-1407. The 911 Board
must allocate a minimum of twenty percent (20%) of the total service charges to the State
Highway Patrol to be used for the support and maintenance of the State's Voice Interoperability
Plan for Emergency Responders (VIPER) system insofar as that system relates to the provision
of 911 services in the State, the provision for the interoperability of 911 systems with one another
and with public safety and first responder radio systems, and the dispatch of first responders in
response to 911 communications. The remaining revenues remitted to the 911 Board for deposit
in the 911 Fund are allocated for distribution to the primary PSAPs, CMRS providers, or the
Accounts established in G.S. 143B-1407."
SECTION 1.(b) This section becomes effective July 1, 2025, and applies to 911
Board allocations made on or after that date.

911 BOARD TO ADOPT TEMPORARY AND PERMANENT RULES
SECTION 2. The 911 Board shall adopt rules in accordance with this act and is
granted authority to adopt temporary rules to enact this act until permanent rules are adopted.
*H695-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025

GENERAL EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 3. Except as otherwise provided, this act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
Page 2 House Bill 695-First Edition